North Dakota, session 69, SB2155.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 5 of section 20.1-03-11 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
5. a. A resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability company, limited liability
partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, and has executed a
lease for at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land that the resident
actively farms or ranches; or a resident that is an individual, corporation, limited liability
company, limited liability partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate,
and holds title to at least one hundred fifty acres [60.70 hectares] of land, is eligible to
submit one application for a license to hunt antelope without charge upon filing a signed
application describing that land. The land must be within a unit open for the hunting of
antelope. The license must include a legal description of the eligible land described in the
completed application and may be used to hunt antelope only upon that land. Upon
request, a lessee shall provide proof that the land described in the completed application
is leased for agricultural purposes. If not otherwise specified in an agricultural lease, the
landowner is entitled to receive the license. An individual licensed under this subsection
must be a resident.
b. If the eligible applicant is a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability
partnership, limited partnership, partnership, trust, or life estate, only one license may be
issued, and the license must be issued in the name of an individual shareholder,
member, partner, beneficiary, or holder of a life estate.
c. A resident who is eligible for a license under this subsection may transfer that eligibility
for the license to a spouse or legal dependent residing customarily with the resident, but
no more than one license may be issued under this subsection for any qualifying land. A
resident transferring eligibility under this subsection may not receive a license under this
subsection for the season for which eligibility was transferred. If not otherwise specified
in an agricultural lease, the landowner is entitled to receive the license.
d. The Except as provided in paragraph 2, the number of licenses issued without charge
under this subsection may not exceed the total numberone-half of the number of licenses
of any pronghorn license type prescribed for each district or unit in the governor's
proclamation.
(1) If the number of eligible persons who apply for licenses issued without charge under
this subsection exceeds the number of licenses prescribed for the district or unit in
the governor's proclamation less any licenses that are otherwise designated to be
issued with a charge under this subsection, the licenses to be issued without charge
must be issued by lottery as prescribed in the governor's proclamation. If the
number of licenses prescribed for the district or unit in the governor's proclamation
exceeds fifty and if the number of applications for these licenses exceeds the
number of licenses prescribed for the district or unit in the governor's proclamation,
then one-half of the licenses exceeding fifty must be issued by lottery as prescribed

S. B. NO. 2155 - PAGE 2
in the governor's proclamation and may not be issued to landowners without
charge.
(2) If an eligible person is unsuccessful in receiving a license without charge under
paragraph 1, the application for a license without charge may be included in a
lottery for remaining licenses issued for the district or unit as prescribed by the
governor's proclamation.

S. B. NO. 2155 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2155.
Senate Vote: Yeas 30 Nays 16 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 75 Nays 14 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State